Utah statutes.
17C-4-102.   Process for adopting a community development project area plan -- Prerequisites -- Restrictions.

(1)  In order to adopt a community development project area plan, after adopting a resolution under Subsection 17C-4-101(1) the agency shall:

(a)  prepare a draft of a community development project area plan and conduct any examination, investigation, and negotiation regarding the project area plan that the agency considers appropriate;

(b)  make the draft project area plan available to the public at the agency's offices during normal business hours;

(c)  provide notice of the plan hearing as provided in Section 17C-4-402;

(d)  hold a public hearing on the draft project area plan and, at that public hearing:

(i)  allow public comment on:

(A)  the draft project area plan; and

(B)  whether the draft project area plan should be revised, approved, or rejected; and

(ii)  receive all written and hear all oral objections to the draft project area plan;

(e)  after holding the plan hearing, at the same meeting or at one or more subsequent meetings consider:

(i)  the oral and written objections to the draft project area plan and evidence and testimony for or against adoption of the draft project area plan; and

(ii)  whether to revise, approve, or reject the draft project area plan;

(f)  approve the draft project area plan, with or without revisions, as the project area plan by a resolution that complies with Section 17C-4-104; and

(g)  submit the project area plan to the community legislative body for adoption.

(2)  An agency may not propose a community development project area plan under Subsection (1) unless the community in which the proposed project area is located:

(a)  has a planning commission; and

(b)  has adopted a general plan under:

(i)  if the community is a city or town, Title 10, Chapter 9a, Part 4, General Plan; or

(ii)  if the community is a county, Title 17, Chapter 27a, Part 4, General Plan.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a draft project area plan may not be modified to add real property to the proposed project area unless the board holds a plan hearing to consider the addition and gives notice of the plan hearing as required under Section 17C-4-402.

(b)  The notice and hearing requirements under Subsection (3)(a) do not apply to a draft project area plan being modified to add real property to the proposed project area if:

(i)  the property is contiguous to the property already included in the proposed project area under the draft project area plan; and

(ii)  the record owner of the property consents to adding the real property to the proposed project area.

